Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-318 Termination or modification of
guardianship. (a) A guardianship terminates upon the death of the ward or
upon order of the court.

(b) On petition of a ward, a guardian, or
another person interested in the ward's welfare, the court may terminate a
guardianship if the ward no longer needs the assistance or protection of a
guardian. The court may modify the type of appointment or powers granted to
the guardian if the extent of protection or assistance previously granted is
currently excessive or insufficient or the ward's capacity to provide for
support, care, education, health, and welfare has so changed as to warrant that
action.

(c) Except as otherwise ordered by the court
for good cause, the court, before terminating a guardianship, shall follow the
same procedures to safeguard the rights of the ward that apply to a petition
for guardianship. Upon presentation by the petitioner of evidence establishing
a prima facie case for termination, the court shall order the termination
unless it is proven by clear and convincing evidence that
continuation of the guardianship is in the best interest of the ward. [L 2004,
c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next